Illinois, session 104th, SB3679.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-631 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-631 new)8    Sec. 2705-631. Intercity grid bus pilot program. The 9Department shall develop an intercity grid bus pilot program 10that offers free and fast buses that interconnect cities, 11suburbs, and townships across the State.